Utah statutes.
63B-18-102.   Additional capital facilities bonds -- Maximum amount --
Projects authorized.
(1)  The total amount of bonds issued under this section may not exceed
$116,117,680.
(2) (a)  Proceeds from the issuance of bonds shall be provided to the division
to provide funds to pay all or part of the cost of acquiring and constructing
the projects listed in this Subsection (2).
(b)  These costs may include the cost of acquiring land, interests in land,
easements and rights-of-way, improving sites, and acquiring, constructing,
equipping, and furnishing facilities and all structures, roads, parking
facilities, utilities, and improvements necessary, incidental, or convenient
to the facilities, interest estimated to accrue on these bonds during the
period to be covered by construction of the projects plus a period of six
months after the end of the construction period, and all related engineering,
architectural, and legal fees.
(c)  For the division, proceeds shall be provided for the following:
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
----------------------------------
CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS
Estimated
Operations              Project
Project                                 and                     Amount
Description                                     Maintenance             Funded
----------------------------                            -----------------
----------------
Purchase and renovation of School
for Deaf and Blind                              $0
$6,500,000
SLCC Digital Design/Communication
Technology Center                               $141,400
$21,305,000
MATC North Utah County Campus
Building                                        $513,800
$18,800,000
Replacement and expansion of
U of U School of Business                       $1,055,100
$22,900,000
OWATC Health Technology Building        $445,300                $21,812,000
Upgrades and repairs to Armories                $0
$4,000,000
SUU Gibson Science Center                       $324,400
$13,851,000
Dixie State College Centennial
Commons Building -- Design              --                      $3,000,000
UVU Science/Health Science
Building Addition -- Design                     --
$2,800,000
TOTAL CAPITAL
DEVELOPMENT
PROJECTS
$114,968,000
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
-------------------------------------
TOTAL GENERAL OBLIGATION BOND AUTHORIZATION
FOR CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT PROJECTS                        $114,968,000
------------------------------------------------------------------------------
-------------------------------------
(d)  For purposes of this section, operations and maintenance costs:
(i)  are estimates only;
(ii)  may include any operations and maintenance costs already funded in
existing agency budgets; and
(iii)  are not commitments by this Legislature or future Legislatures to fund
those operations and maintenance costs.
(3) (a)  The amounts funded as listed in Subsection (2) are estimates only and
do not constitute a limitation on the amount that may be expended for any
project.
(b)  The board may revise these estimates and redistribute the amount
estimated for a project among the projects authorized.
(c)  The commission, by resolution and in consultation with the board, may
delete one or more projects from this list if the inclusion of that project or
those projects in the list could be construed to violate state law or federal
law or regulation.
(4) (a)  The division may enter into agreements related to these projects
before the receipt of proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter.
(b)  The division shall make those expenditures from unexpended and
unencumbered building funds already appropriated to the Capital Projects Fund.
(c)  The division shall reimburse the Capital Projects Fund upon receipt of
the proceeds of bonds issued under this chapter.
(d)  The state intends to use proceeds of tax-exempt bonds to reimburse itself
for expenditures for costs of the projects listed in Subsection (2)(c).
(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the funding authorized for
projects in Subsection (2) does not include funds for public art.
